California, session 20252026, SB556.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1350.5 is added to the Fish and Game Code, to read:1350.5. Upon appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act or another statute, statute for the purposes of this section, the sum of twenty-one million five hundred thousand dollars ($21,500,000) shall be allocated to the Wildlife Conservation Board for floodplain acquisition, habitat restoration, and associated conservation projects on floodplains in the Counties of Kern, Kings, and Tulare.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the unique uncontrolled flooding and groundwater depletion circumstances existing at the various waterways in the Counties of Kern, Kings, and Tulare.